Georgia statutes. TITLE 13 Contracts
Article 2 Performance

13-4-20.
Requirements as to performance of contractual obligations generally.

Performance, to be effectual, must be accomplished by the party bound to perform, or by his agent where personal skill is not required, or by someone substituted, by consent, in his place, and must be substantially in compliance with the spirit and the letter of the contract and completed within a reasonable time.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2811; Code 1868, § 2819; Code 1873, § 2870; Code 1882, § 2870; Civil Code 1895, § 3724; Civil Code 1910, § 4318; Code 1933, § 20-1101.

13-4-21.
Effect of act of God.

If performance of the terms of a contract becomes impossible as a result of an act of God, such impossibility shall excuse nonperformance, except where, by proper prudence, such impossibility might have been avoided by the promisor.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2812; Code 1868, § 2820; Code 1873, § 2871; Code 1882, § 2871; Civil Code 1895, § 3725; Civil Code 1910, § 4319; Code 1933, § 20-1102.

Section inapplicable where purpose for which premises rented later becomes illegal. —

After tenant rented hotel that included saloon and later sale of liquor was prohibited by legislature, tenant was liable for full amount of rent, and the act of God provisions were inapplicable. Lawrence v. White, 131 Ga. 840, 63 S.E. 631, 1909 Ga. LEXIS 21 (1909).

13-4-22.
Effect of refusal of party to perform concurrent condition upon offer of performance by other party.

Where the conditions as to performance of a contract are concurrent, if one party offers to perform and the other refuses to perform, the first shall be discharged from the performance of his part of the contract and may maintain an action against the other.

History.
Civil Code 1895, § 3708; Civil Code 1910, § 4302; Code 1933, § 20-903.

13-4-23.
Effect of nonperformance caused by conduct of other party.

If the nonperformance of a party to a contract is caused by the conduct of the opposite party, such conduct shall excuse the other party from performance.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2814; Code 1868, § 2822; Code 1873, § 2873; Code 1882, § 2873; Civil Code 1895, § 3727; Civil Code 1910, § 4321; Code 1933, § 20-1104.

Section permits one to waive breach and sue in quantum meruit for services performed. —

Party to contract who has partly performed by rendering valuable services may, if it appears that opposite party has repudiated and abandoned contract, or has prevented former from further performance, waive one’s right to recover for breach of contract, and, by treating contract as rescinded, maintain action in quantum meruit against other contracting party for value of services rendered. Weathercraft Co. v. Byrd, 32 Ga. App. 369, 123 S.E. 180, 1924 Ga. App. LEXIS 404 (1924).

13-4-24.
Requirements for and effect of tender generally.

A tender properly made may be equivalent to performance. The tender must be certain and unconditional, except for a receipt in full or delivery of the obligation, and may be made by an agent and to an agent authorized to receive. The tender must be in full payment of the specific debt, and not in part, and may be made at any time before trial. If tender is rejected on grounds unrelated to informality, informality cannot afterward be raised in objection to the tender.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2815; Code 1868, § 2823; Code 1873, § 2874; Code 1882, § 2874; Civil Code 1895, § 3728; Civil Code 1910, § 4322; Code 1933, § 20-1105.

13-4-25.
Tender of chattels.

A valid tender of chattels transfers the title thereto to the person bound to receive; and the possession of the promisor, if he retains possession from that time, is for the benefit of the owner but without liability to account for profits or for more than ordinary prudence in preservation and protection of the chattels.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2818; Code 1868, § 2826; Code 1873, § 2877; Code 1882, § 2877; Civil Code 1895, § 3731; Civil Code 1910, § 4325; Code 1933, § 20-1108.

13-4-26.
Delivery on demand; delivery at certain time and place.

If the promise of a party is to deliver on demand, the demand must be reasonable as to time, place, and manner; if the promise is to deliver at a certain time and place, a tender at the time and place is effective though the receiver is not present.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2817; Code 1868, § 2825; Code 1873, § 2876; Code 1882, § 2876; Civil Code 1895, § 3730; Civil Code 1910, § 4324; Code 1933, § 20-1107.